858 > CHAPTER 32
Muslim, the other Serbian and Christian. The American negotiator Richard Holbrooke finally brought the warring parties together in 1995 and crafted an agreement to partition Bosnia.
The Republican Resurgence
In 1994, for the first time in forty years, Republicans gained control of both houses of Congress. Throughout 1995, the Republican Congress worked at a sometimes feverish pace to construct an ambitious and even radical legislative program. The Republicans proposed a series of measures to transfer important powers from the federal government to the states. They proposed dramatic reductions in federal spending, including a major restructuring of the Medicare program. In all these efforts, they could count on a disciplined Republican majority in the House and an only slightly less united Republican majority in the Senate.
President Clinton responded to the 1994 election results by proclaiming that "the era of big government is over” and shifting his own agenda conspicuously to the center. He announced his own plan to cut taxes and balance the budget. But compromise between the president and the Republicans in Congress became difficult. In November 1995 and again in January 1996, the federal government shut down for several days because the president and Congress could not agree on a budget. That proved to be an epic political blunder. Public opinion turned quickly and powerfully against the Republican leadership and much of its agenda. House Speaker Newt Gingrich quickly became discredited, while President Clinton slowly improved his standing in the polls.
The Election of 1996
By 1996, President Clinton was in a commanding position to win reelection. Unopposed for the Democratic nomination, he
faced a Republican opponent-Senator Robert Dole of Kansas-who inspired little enthusiasm even within his own party.
Clinton’s revival was a result of his adroitness in taking centrist positions that under-
Clinton versus Dole
mined the Republicans and in championing traditional Democratic issues that were broadly popular. But his greatest strength came from the remarkable success of the American economy. Like Reagan in 1984, he could campaign as the champion of peace, prosperity, and national well-being.
As the election approached, Congress passed several important bills. It raised the legal minimum wage for the first time in more than a decade. And it passed a welfare reform bill, which President Clinton somewhat reluctantly signed, that marked the most important change in aid to the poor since the Social Security Act of 1935. The bill ended the fifty-year federal guarantee of assistance to families with dependent children and turned most of the responsibility for allocating federal welfare funds (now greatly reduced) to the states. Most important, it shifted the bulk of welfare benefits away from those without jobs and toward support for low-wage workers.
Clinton’s buoyant campaign flagged slightly in the last weeks, but the president nevertheless received just over 49 percent of the popular vote. Clinton won 379 electoral votes to Dole’s 159 (Ross Perot received 0 electoral votes). But other Democrats made only modest gains and failed to regain either house of Congress.
Clinton Triumphant and Embattled
Bill Clinton was the first Democratic president to win two terms as president since Franklin Roosevelt. He still faced a hostile Republican Congress. He proposed a modest domestic agenda, consisting of tax cuts and tax credits targeted at middle-class
CLINTON AND GINGRICH
For a time after Republicans won control of both houses of Congress in 1994, some observers suggested that Newt Gingrich was now the most powerful figure in government, and that President Clinton was (as some journalists suggested) irrelevant. But Clinton surprised everyone by working cordially with Gingrich and, in the process, rebuilding his own popularity. They are seen here together in public at a senior center in Claremont, New Hampshire. (John Mottern/© AFP/Getty Images) THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION * 859
Bill Clinton (Democratic)
379
159
47,401,185
(49.3)
39,197,469
(40.7)
Robert Dole (Republican)
Ross Perot (Reform)
0	8,085,294
°	(8.4)
49% of electorate voting
THE ELECTION OF 1996
Ross Perot did much less well in 1996 than he had in 1992, and President Clinton came much closer than he had four years earlier to winning a majority of the popular vote. Once again, Clinton defeated his Republican opponent, this time Robert Dole, by a decisive margin in both the popular and electoral vote. After the 1994 Republican landslide in the congressional elections, Bill Clinton had seemed permanently weakened. * What explains Clinton's political revival?
Budget Americans to help them educate their chil-
Surpluses dren. He also negotiated effectively with the Republican leadership on a plan for a balanced budget, which passed late in 1997. By the end of 1998, the federal budget was generating its first surplus in thirty years.
Clinton needed the popularity he had gained from the budget surplus when the most serious crisis of his presidency emerged. Clinton had been bedeviled by scandals from his first weeks in office. In early 1998, the president was
charged with having had a sexual relationship with a young White House intern, Monica Lewinsky, and lying about it in a deposition. Those revelations produced a new investigation by the independent counsel in the Whitewater case, Kenneth Starr, a former judge and official in the Reagan Justice Department. Clinton forcefully denied the charges, and the public strongly backed him. His popularity soared to record levels and remained high throughout the year that followed.
The Lewinsky scandal revived again in August 1998, when
Lewinsky struck a deal with the independent counsel and
testified about her relationship with Clinton. Starr then subpoe-
naed Clinton himself, who finally admitted that he and Lewinsky
Monica
Lewinsky
had what he called an "improper relationship.” A few weeks later, Starr recommended that Congress impeach the president.
The House Judiciary Committee and then, on December 19, 1998, the full House, approved two counts of impeachment: lying to the grand jury and obstructing justice. The matter
Impeachment r^en moveclt0 £he Senate, where a trial of the president-the first since the trial of
Andrew Johnson in 1868-began in early January. The trial ended with a decisive acquittal of the president.
In 1999, the president faced the most serious foreign policy crisis of his presidency, once again in the Balkans. A long-simmering Kosovo conflict between the Serbian government of
Yugoslavia and Kosovo separatists erupted into a savage civil war in 1998. In May 1999, NATO forces-dominated and led by the United States-began a bombing campaign against the Serbians, which after little more than a week led the leader of Yugoslavia, Slobodan Milosevic, to agree to a cease-fire. Serbian troops withdrew from Kosovo. They were replaced by NATO peacekeeping forces. A precarious peace returned to the region.
Clinton finished his eight years in office with his popularity higher than it had been when he had taken office. Indeed, public approval of Clinton’s presidency-a presidency marked by astonishing prosperity and general world stability-was consistently among the highest of any postwar president, despite the many scandals and setbacks he suffered in the White House.
The Election of 2000
George W. Bush versus Al Gore
The 2000 presidential election was one of the most extraordinary in American history-not because of the campaign that preceded it, but because of the sensational controversy over its results.
George W. Bush-a Republican, a son of the former president, and a second-term governor of Texas-and Vice President Al Gore, a Democrat, easily won the nominations of their parties.
Both men ran cautious, centrist campaigns. Polls showed an exceptionally tight race right up to the end. In the congressional races, Republicans maintained control of the House of Florida Representatives by five seats, while the
Senate split evenly between Democrats and Republicans. In the presidential race, Gore won the national popular vote by about 540,000 votes out of about 100 million cast (or. 05%). But on election night, both candidates remained short of the 270 electoral votes needed for victory because no one could determine who had won the electoral votes of Florida. After a mandatory recount over the next two days, Bush led Gore in the state by fewer than 300 votes.
When a court-ordered deadline arrived, the recount was not yet complete. The Florida secretary of state, a Republican, then certified Bush the winner in Florida by a little more than 500 votes. The Gore campaign contested the results.
The Supreme Court’s Decision
860 ® CHAPTER 32
ELECTION NIGHT, 2000
The electronic billboard in New York City’s Times Square, showing network coverage of the presidential contest, reports George Bush the winner of the 2000 presidential race late on election night. A few hours later, the networks retracted their projections because of continuing uncertainty over the results in Florida. Five weeks later, and then only because of the controversial intervention of the Supreme Court, Bush finally emerged the victor. (© Chris Hondros/Getty Images) 
Late on December 12, the U.S. Supreme Court Issued a controversial 5-4 decision for Bush and the long election ended.
The Second Bush Presidency
George W. Bush assumed the presidency in January 2001 burdened by both the controversies surrounding his election and the perception that he was ill prepared for the office.
Bush’s principal campaign promise had been that he would
Bush Tax Cuts USe Pre^ictec^ budget surplus to finance a massive tax reduction. He narrowly won passage of the largest tax cut in American history-$1.35 tril-
lion over several years.
Having campaigned as a moderate adept at building coalitions across party lines, Bush governed as a staunch
51 % of electorate voting
THE ELECTION OF 2000
The 2000 presidential election was one of the closest and most controversial in American history. It also starkly revealed a new pattern of party strength, which had been developing over the previous decade. Democrats swept the Northeast and most of the industrial Midwest and carried all the states of the Pacific Coast. Republicans swept the South, the plains states, and the mountain states (with the exception of New Mexico) and held on to a few traditional Republican strongholds in the Midwest. * Compare this map to those of earlier elections, in particular the election of 1896, and ask how the pattern of party support changed over the course of the twentieth century.
conservative, relying on one of the most orthodox members of his own party for support. The president’s political adviser, Karl Rove, encouraged the administration to take increasingly conservative positions. Bush appealed to the gun lobby by refusing to support a renewal of the assault weapons ban that Clinton had enacted. He proposed a constitutional amendment to ban gay marriage. The Bush administration was part of a broad and successful effort to mobilize evangelical Christians as an active part of the Republican coalition. But almost from the beginning, the aftermath of the September 11 attacks dominated both Bush’s presidency and the nation’s politics.
The Election of 2004
The 2004 election pitted President Bush, who was unopposed within his party, against John Kerry, a Democratic senator from Massachusetts. Throughout the months before the election, voters were almost evenly divided again. The election itself, although very close, was more decisive than the election of 2000. Bush won 51 percent of the popular vote to Kerry’s 48.
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION 861
FLIP-FLOPPING
The tradition of accusing opponents of changing their public positions for political gain, called flip-flopping, has been a long-time feature of American politics. Here, a supporter of George W. Bush uses her footwear to ridicule his opponent, Senator John Kerry as a flip-flopper on the issue of the war with Iraq. (© Wilfredo Lee/AP Images) Candidate (Party)	Electoral Vote	Popular Vote (%)
George W. Bush	286	62,040,606
(Republican)		(51)
John F. Kerry	252	59,028,109
(Democratic)		(48)
60% of electorate voting
THE ECONOMIC BOOM
The last three decades have seen remarkable changes in American life-some a result of the end of the Cold War, some the changing character of the American population, and some a product of a rapidly evolving culture. But most of these changes were at least in part a product of the dramatic transformation of the American economy.
From "Stagflation" to Growth
The roots of the economic growth of the 1980s, 1990s, and 2000s lay in part in the troubled years of the 1970s, when the United States seemed for a time to be losing its ability to produce long-term prosperity. In the face of the sluggish growth and persistent inflation of those years, however, many American corporations began making important changes in the way they ran their businesses-changes that contributed to both the prosperity of the last decades of the twentieth century and the growing inequality that
Pra^tkzes accompanied it. Businesses invested heavily in new technology, to make themselves more efficient and productive. Corporations began to consider
mergers to provide themselves with a more diversified basis for growth. Many enterprises created more-energy-efficient plants and offices. Perhaps most important of all, American businesses sought to reduce their labor costs, which were among the highest in the world and which many economists and business leaders believed had made the United States
THE ELECTION OF 2004
The 2004 election repeated the pattern established in 2000. The Democrats, led this time by Massachusetts senator John F. Kerry, swept the Northeast, most of the industrial Midwest, and the Pacific Coast. The Republicans, led by President Bush, carried almost everything else. Although Bush's popular and electoral margins were both larger than they had been in 2000, the election remained extremely close. uncompetitive against the many emerging economies that relied on low-wage workers.
Businesses cut labor costs in many ways. They took a much harder line against unions. Nonunion companies became more successful in staving off unionization drives. Some companies moved their operations to areas of the country where unions were weak and wages low-the American South and Midwest in particular. And many companies moved much of their production out of the United States, to such nations as Mexico and China, where there were large available pools of cheaper labor.
Digital technology made possible an enormous range of new products: computers, the Internet, cellular phones, digital music, video, and cameras, personal
^wustries^ digital assistants, and many other products.
The technology industries created many new jobs and produced new consumer needs and appetites. But they did not create as many jobs as older industrial
sectors had.
The American economy experienced rapid growth in the last decades of the twentieth century and into the twenty-first. The gross national product (the total of goods and services produced by the United States) almost quadrupled in twenty years-from $2.7 trillion in 1980, to over $9.8 trillion in 2000, to $15.7 trillion by 2013. Inflation was low throughout these decades, never rising above 3 percent in any year. Stock prices
862 * CHAPTER 32
soared to unprecedented levels, and with few interruptions, from the mid-1980s to the end of the century. The Dow Jones Industrial Average, the most common index of stock performance, stood at 1,000 in late 1980. Late in 1999, it passed 11,000, and in November 2013 it peaked at 16,000 for the first time ever. Economic growth was particularly robust in the last years of the 1990s. In 1997 and 1998, annual growth rates reached 5 percent for the first time since the 1960s. Most impressive of all was the longevity of the boom. From 1994 to 2000, the economy recorded growth-at times very substantial growth-in every year, indeed in every quarter, something that had never before happened so continuously in peacetime.
The Two-Tiered Economy
Although the American economy revived from the sluggishness of the 1970s and early 1980s, the benefits of the new economy were less widely shared than those of earlier boom times. The increasing abundance of the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries created enormous new wealth that enriched those talented or lucky enough to profit from the areas of booming growth. The rewards for education-particularly in such areas as science and engineering-increased substantially.
The gross domestic product was more than $15 trillion at the end of 2013. Even so, incomes remained flat for most Americans. Poverty in the country had steadily declined, sometimes dramatically, in the years after World War II, so that by the end of the 1970s the percentage of people living in poverty had fallen to 12 percent (from 20 percent in preceding decades). But the decline in poverty did not continue, and in 2013 it reached 15 percent of the population, which means that 46 million Americans were living in poverty.
Globalization
Perhaps the most important economic change was what became known as the "globalization” of the economy. The great prosperity of the 1950s and 1960s had rested on the relative insulation of the United States from the pressures of international competition. As late as 1970, international trade still played a relatively small role in the American economy, which thrived on the basis of the huge domestic market in North America.
By the end of the 1970s, however, the world had intruded on the American economy in profound ways, and that intrusion increased unabated into the twenty-first century. Exports rose from just under $43 billion in 1970 to over $1 trillion in 2006. But imports rose even more dramatically: from just over $40 billion in 1970 to over $1.8 trillion in 2006. Most American products, in other words, now faced foreign competition inside the United States. The first American trade imbalance in the postwar era occurred in 1971; only twice since then, in 1973 and 1975, has the balance been favorable.
THE GLOBAL ECONOMY
Hundreds of shipping containers, virtually all of them from China, stand waiting for delivery at the Yang Ming container terminal in Los Angeles in February 2001—an illustration of the increasing penetration of the American market by overseas manufacturers and of the growing interconnections between the U.S. economy and that of the rest of the world. (© Reed Saxon/AP Images) SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY IN THE NEW ECONOMY
The "new economy'’ that emerged in the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries was driven by dramatic new scientific and technological discoveries that had profound effects on the way Americans-and peoples throughout the world-lived.
The Digital Revolution
The most visible element of the technological revolution to most Americans was the dramatic growth in the use of computers and other digital electronic devices in almost every area of life.
Among the most significant innovations that contributed to the digital revolution was the development of the microprocessor, first introduced in 1971 by Intel, which represented a notable advance in the technology of integrated circuitry. A microprocessor miniaturized the central processing unit of a computer, making it possible for a small machine to perform calculations
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION > 863
that in the past only very large machines could do. Considerable technological innovation was needed before the microprocessor could actually become the basis of what was at first known as a "minicomputer” and then a '’personal computer.” But in 1977, Apple launched its Apple II personal computer, the first such machine to be widely available to the public. Several years later,
Development IBM entered the Personal computer market of the PC widl tde drst	had engaged a small
software development company, Microsoft, to design an operating system for its new computer. Microsoft produced a program known as MS-DOS (DOS for "disk operating system”). No PC could operate without it. The PC, and its software, made its debut in August 1981 and immediately became
enormously successful.
The computer revolution created thousands of new, lucrative businesses: computer manufacturers (new companies quickly began to rival IBM in the PC market); makers of the tiny silicon chips that ran the computers and allowed smaller and smaller machines to become more and more powerful; and manufacturers of accessories and software.
The Internet
Out of the computer revolution emerged another dramatic source of information and communication: the Internet. It had
ARPA	its beginning in 1963, in the U.S. govern-
ment’s Advanced Research Projects Agency
(ARPA), which funneled federal funds into scientific research projects, many of them defense related.
By 1971, twenty-three computers were linked together in ARPA’s network, which served mostly research labs and universities. Gradually, interest in the system began to spread, and with it the number of computers connected to it. The network, soon renamed the Internet, was then free to develop independently. It did so rapidly, especially after the invention of technologies that made possible digital mail (e-mail) and the emergence of the personal computer, which vastly increased the
number of potential users of the Internet. As late as 1984, there remained fewer than a thousand host computers connected to the Internet. A decade later, there were over 6 million. And by 2013, over two billion computers were in use around the world.
As the amount of information on the Internet proliferated, without any central direction, new forms of software emerged to make it possible for individual users to navigate through the vast
__	number of Internet sites. In 1989, Tim
World Wide
Web	Berners-Lee, a British scientist working at a
laboratory in Geneva, introduced the World
Wide Web, through which individual users could publish information for the Internet. It helped establish an orderly system for both the distribution and retrieval of electronic information.
Breakthroughs in Genetics
Computer technology helped fuel explosive growth in all areas of scientific research, particularly genetics. Early discoveries in genetics by Gregor Mendel, Thomas Hunt Morgan, and others had laid the groundwork for more-dramatic breakthroughs-the discovery of DNA by the British scientists Oswald Avery, Colin MacLeod, and Maclyn McCarty in 1944; and in 1953, the discovery by the American biochemist James Watson and the British biophysicist Francis Crick of its double-helix structure, and thus of the key to identifying genetic codes. From these discoveries emerged the new science-and ultimately the new industry-of genetic engineering, through which new medical treatments and new techniques for hybridization of plants and animals became possible.
Little by little, scientists began to identify specific genes in humans and other living things that determine particular traits, and to learn how to alter or reproduce them. But the identification of genes was painfully slow. In 1989, the federal government appropriated $3 billion to fund the National Center for the Human Genome, to accelerate the
mapping of human genes. The Human Genome Project identified 3 billion genes by 2013.
In the meantime, DNA research had already attracted considerable public attention. The DNA structure of an individual, scientists have discovered, is as unique and as identifiable as a fingerprint. DNA testing, therefore, makes it possible to identify individuals through their blood, semen, skin, or even hair. It plays a major role in criminal investigations, among other things.
Human
Genome
Project
A CHANGING SOCIETY
The American population changed dramatically in the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries. It grew larger, older, and more racially and ethnically diverse.
A
Shifting Population Decreasing birth rates and growing life spans contributed to one of the most important characteristics of the American
TWENTY-FOUR HOUR NEWS CYCLE
With the vast popularity of digital communication news events are reported every hour of every day rather than during scheduled
television programs or from reading the newspaper. With a portable tablets or smart phones, a
person can keep up with what is new at any time or any place. Politicians now have much less
control over how their messages are transmitted and received. (© Ian Dagnall/Alamy)
864 CHAPTER 32
THE HUMAN GENOME
This computerized image is a digital representation of part of the human genome, the constellation of genetic material that makes up the human body. The Human Genome Project, one of the most ambitious in the history of science, set out in the late 1990s to chart the human genetic structure. Each color in this image represents one of the four chemical components of DNA, the principal material of genes. (© Mario Tama/Getty Images) population in the twenty-first century: its increasing agedness. The enormous "baby boom” generation-people born in the first ten years after World War II-drove the median age steadily upward (from 34 in 1996 to 37 in 2010 to a projected 39 by 2035). This growing population of aging Americans contributed to stresses on the Social Security and Medicare systems, including the provisions of the Affordable Care Act introduced by President Obama. It also had important implications for the workforce. In the last twenty years of the twentieth century, the number of people aged 25-54 (known statistically as the prime workforce) grew by over 26 million. In the first ten years of the twenty-first century, the number of workers in that age group did not grow at all.
The slowing growth of the native-born population, and the workforce shortages it has helped to create, is one reason for the rapid growth of immigration. In 2010, the number of foreign-born residents of the United States was the highest in American history-more than 36 million people, over 12 percent of the total population. These immigrants came from a wider variety of backgrounds than ever before, as a result of the 1965 Immigration Reform Act, which eliminated national origins as a criterion for admission. The growing presence of the foreign-born contributed to a significant
drop in the percentage of white residents in the United States-from 90 percent in 1965 (the year of the Immigration Reform Act) to 74 in 2014. Latinos and Asians were by far
Rates of birth per 1,000 people 30
THE AMERICAN BIRTH RATE, 1960-2010
This chart shows the striking change e pattern of the nation s birth rate from the twenty years after 1940, which produced the great baby boom.” From 1960 onward, the nation’s birth rate steadily, and in the 1960s and 1970s dramatically, declined.
population?1 M deCl'n'n9 b'rth rate have on the a9e structure of the
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION * 865
the largest groups of immigrants in these years. But others came in significant numbers from Africa, the Middle East, Russia, and eastern Europe.
African Americans in the Post—Civil Rights Era
The civil rights movement and the other liberal efforts of the 1960s had two very different effects on African Americans. On the one hand, there were increased opportunities for advancement available to those in a position to take advantage of them. On the other hand, as the industrial economy declined and government services dwindled, there was a growing sense of helplessness and despair among large groups of nonwhites who continued to find themselves barred from upward mobility.
Economic Progress for African Americans
The
'’Underclass”
For the black middle class, which in the first decade of the twenty-first century constituted over half of the African American population of America, progress was remarkable in the decades after the high point of the civil rights movement. African American families moved into more-affluent urban and suburban communities. The percentage of black high-
school graduates going on to college was virtually the same as that of white high-school graduates by the early twenty-first century (although a smaller proportion of blacks than whites completed high school). Just over 20 percent of African Americans over the age of twenty-four held bachelor’s degrees or higher in 2010, compared to 30 percent of whites, a significant advance from twenty years earlier. And African Americans were making rapid strides in many professions in which only a generation earlier they had been barred or segregated. Over half of all employed blacks in the United States had skilled white-collar jobs in 2010. There were few areas of American life from which blacks were any longer entirely excluded.
But there were still many other African Americans whom the economic growth and the liberal programs of the 1960s and beyond had never reached. These impoverished people-sometimes described as the "underclass” -made up as much as a third of the nation’s black population. Many of them lived in isolated, decaying, and desperately poor inner-city
neighborhoods. As more successful blacks moved out of the inner cities, the poor were left behind in their decaying neighborhoods. Less than half of young inner-city African Americans finished high school in 2006; more than 60 percent were unemployed. The black family structure suffered as well from the dislocations of urban poverty. There was a radical increase in the number of single-parent, femaleheaded black households. In 1970, only 59 percent of all black children under 18 lived with both their parents (already down from 70 percent a decade earlier). In 2010, only 35 percent of black children lived in such households, while 74 percent of white children did.
Total immigration during five-year periods (in millions)
6.10
1961- 1966- 1971- 1976- 1981- 1986- 1991- 1996-1965 1970 1975 1980 1985 1990 1995 2000
TOTAL IMMIGRATION, 1960-2010
This chart shows the tremendous increase in immigration to the United States in the decades since the Immigration Reform Act of 1965. The immigration of the 1980s and 1990s was the highest since the late nineteenth century. (© Comstock) * What role did the 1965 act have in increasing immigration levels?
SOURCES OF IMMIGRATION, 1995-2010
The Immigration Reform Act of 1965 lifted the national quotas imposed on immigration policy in 1924 and opened immigration to large areas of the world that had previously been restricted. In 1965, 90 percent of the immigrants to the United States came from Europe. As this chart shows, by 2010 almost the reverse was true. Well over 80 percent of all immigrants came from non-European sources. The most important countries of origin in this period were (in order) Mexico, China, the Philippines, India, Vietnam, and Cuba. » What impact did this new immigration have on American politics?
866 ® CHAPTER 32
Occupational Sector
Manufacturing
White-collar
COMPARISON OF BLACK AND WHITE OCCUPATIONAL DISTRIBUTION, 2005
By the early twenty-first century, as this chart makes clear, the African-American middle class had grown dramatically. Over half of all employed black workers in the United States worked in "white-collar" jobs. Perhaps even more striking, given the distribution of the black population a half century earlier, is that almost no African Americans (about one-third of 1 percent) were working in agriculture by the early 2000s. But the gap between black and white workers remained wide in several areas, particularly in the percentage of each group employed in low-wage service jobs. • What factors contributed to the increase of the black middle class in the years after 1960?
Modern Plagues: Drugs and AIDS
Two new and deadly epidemics ravaged many American communities beginning in the 1980s. One was a dramatic increase in drug use, which penetrated nearly every community in the nation. The enormous demand for drugs, particularly for "crack” cocaine in the late 1980s and early 1990s, spawned what was in effect a multibillion-dollar industry. Drug use declined significantly among middle-class people beginning in the late 1980s, but the epidemic declined much more slowly in the poor urban neighborhoods where it was doing the most severe damage.
The drug epidemic was related to another scourge of the late twentieth century: the epidemic spread of a new and often lethal disease first documented in 1981 and soon named AIDS (acquired immune deficiency syndrome). AIDS is the product of the HIV virus, which is transmitted by the exchange of bodily fluids (blood or semen). The first American victims of
AIDS (and for many years the group among whom cases remained the most numerous) were gay men. But by the late 1980s, as the gay community began to take preventive measures, the most rapid increase in the spread of the disease occurred among heterosexuals, many of them intravenous drug users, who spread the virus by sharing contaminated hypodermic needles.
AIDS
Epidemic
In the mid-1990s, AIDS researchers, after years of frustration, began discovering effective treatments for the disease. By taking a combination of powerful drugs on a rigorous schedule, even people with advanced cases of AIDS experienced dramatic improvement-so much so that in many cases there were no measurable quantities of the virus left in their bloodstreams. The new drugs gave promise for the first time of dramatically extending the lives of people with AIDS, perhaps to normal life spans. But the drugs were very expensive and difficult to administer; poor AIDS patients often could not obtain access to them. And the drugs remained scarce in Africa and other less-affluent parts of the world where the epidemic was rampant. The United Nations, many philanthropic organizations, and a number of governments, including the United States, committed significant funds to fight the AIDS crisis in Africa in the 2000s, but progress remained slow.
A CONTESTED CULTURE
American culture changed dramatically in the years after World War II. By the 1960s, the roles of women began to change profoundly. The sexual revolution changed traditional American values. American culture also became more diverse, open, and contentious than it had been in the past. As a result, new controversies and issues emerged.
Battles over Feminism and Abortion
Among the goals of what was known as the "New Right” were challenges to feminism and its achievements. Conservatives had campaigned successfully against the proposed Equal Rights Amendment to the Constitution. They also played a central role in the most divisive issue of the last thirty years: the controversy over abortion rights.
For those who favored allowing women to choose to terminate unwanted pregnancies, the Supreme Court’s decision in Roe v. Wade (1973) had seemed to settle the question. By the 1980s, abortion was the most commonly performed surgical procedure in the country. But at the
"R.IGHT-TO-
Life”
Movement
jciiiiv. nmc,



creating a powerful grassroots movement. The right-to-life movement, as it called itself, found its most fervent supporters among Catholics; and indeed, the Catholic Church
itself lent its institutional authority to the battle against legalized abortion. Religious doctrine also motivated the anti-abortion stance of many Mormons, evangelical Christians, and other groups. The opposition of some other anti-abortion activists had less to do with religion than with their commitment to traditional notions of family and gender relations. To them, abortion was part of a much larger assault by feminists on the role of women as wives and mothers. It was also, many foes contended, a form of murder. Fetuses, they claimed, were human beings who had a right to life” from the moment of conception.

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION * 867
Although the right-to-life movement was persistent in its demand for a reversal of Roe v. Wade or, barring that, a constitutional amendment banning abortion, it also attacked abortion in more-limited ways, at its most vulnerable points. Starting in the late 1970s, Congress and many state legislatures began barring the use of public funds to pay for abortions, thus making them almost inaccessible for many poor women in some states. The Reagan and the two Bush administrations imposed further restrictions on federal funding and even on the right of doctors in federally funded clinics to give patients any information on abortion. Extremists in the right-to-life movement began picketing, occupying, and at times bombing abortion clinics. Several anti-abortion activists murdered doctors who performed abortions; other physicians were subject to campaigns of terrorism and harassment. The changing composition of the Supreme Court between 1981 and 2010 (during which time new conservative justices were appointed to the Court) renewed the right-to-life movement’s hopes for a reversal of Roe v. Wade.
The changing judicial climate of the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries mobilized defenders of abortion as never before. They called themselves the "pro-choice” move-"Pro Choice” ment’ because they were defending not so Movement much abortion itself as every woman’s right to choose whether and when to bear a child. The pro-choice movement was in many parts of the country at least as strong as, and in some areas much stronger than, the right-to-life movement. With the election of President Clinton in 1992, a supporter of "choice,” the immediate threat to Roe v. Wade seemed to fade. Clinton’s reelection in 1996 was evidence that the pro-choice movement maintained considerable political strength. But abortion rights remained highly vulnerable. Clinton’s successor, George W. Bush, openly opposed abortion. Barack Obama supported the right to abor-
tion when he became president.
The Growth of Environmentalism
The environmental movement grew dramatically in the early 1970s and continues to develop in the present. An early milestone was Earth Day, held on April 22, 1970, a day that generated wide-scale interest in the environment. The federal government displayed only light interest in the subject, but many people became invested in studying the effects of "global warming”-a steady rise in the earth’s temperature resulting from emissions from burned fossil fuels, most notably coal and oil. Many other people either ignored or disavowed the impact of such industrial waste on the environment. In 1997, representatives of the major industrial nations met in Kyoto, Japan, and agreed to a broad treaty to reduce carbon emissions to slow or reverse global warming. Republicans in Congress prevented the ratification of this treaty in the United States. The United States again refused to participate in this global initiative during the presidency of George W. Bush, who argued that doing so would place too great of an economic burden on the country. Barack Obama, too, has done little about global warming. Without the participation of the United States and China, another country that has not signed the Kyoto Protocol, most environmentalists consider the treaty to be dead.
THE PERILS OF GLOBALIZATION
The celebration of the beginning of a new millennium on January 1, 2000, was a notable moment not just because of the change in the calendar. It was notable above all as a global event-a shared and for the most part joyous experience that united the world in its exuberance. But if the millennium celebrations suggested the bright promise of globalization, other events at the dawn of the new century suggested its dark perils.
BP OIL SPILL
This photograph shows the efforts of BP attempting to cap the oil spill that was a result of an explosion on an offshore drilling platform. The oil leaked for months, and it continues to damage the ecology of the Gulf of Mexico even a year later. (© Julie Dermansky/Corbis) long musical lineage of rap includes elements of the disco and street funk of the 1970s; of the fast-talking jive of black radio DJs in the 1950s; of the onstage patter of Cab
Calloway and other African American stars of the first half of the twentieth century. It contains reminders of tap and break dancing—even of the boxing-ring poetry of Muhammad Ali.
Rap's most important element is its words. Rap is as much a form of language as a form of music. It bears a distant resemblance to some traditions of African American pulpit oratory, which also included forms of spoken song. It draws from some of the verbal traditions of urban black street life, including the "dozens"—a ritualized trading of insults particularly popular among young black men.
But rap is also the product of a distinctive place and time: the South Bronx in the 1970s and 1980s and the hip hop culture that was born there and that soon dominated the appearance and public behavior of many young black males. "Hip hop is how you walk, talk, live, see, act, feel," said one Bronx hip hopper. Some elements of hip hop culture faded, and by the 1990s the most popular element of hip hop culture was rap, which had by then been developing for nearly twenty years.
Beginning in the early 1970s, Bronx DJs began setting up their equipment on neighborhood streets and staging block parties, where they not only played records but also put on shows of their own—performances that featured spoken rhymes, jazzy phrases, and pointed comments about the audience, the neighborhood, and themselves. Gradually, the DJs began to bring "rappers" into shows—young men who developed the DJ style into a much more elaborate form of performance, usually accompanied by dancing. As rap grew more popular in the inner city, record promoters began signing some of its new stars. In 1979, the Sugarhill Gang's "Rapper’s Delight" became the first rap single to be played on mainstream commercial radio and the first to become a major hit. In the early 1980s, Run-DMC became the first national rap superstars. From there, rap moved quickly to become one of the most popular and commercially successful forms of popular music, In the 1990s and early 2000s, rap recordings routinely sold millions of copies.
Rap has taken many forms. There have been white rappers (Eminem, House of Pain), female rappers (Missy Elliot, Queen Latifah), even religious rappers and children's rappers. But it has always been
primarily a product of the young male culture of the inner city, and some of the most successful rap has conveyed the frustration and anger that these men have felt about their lives—"a voice for the oppressed people," one rap artist said, "that in many other ways don’t have a voice." In 1982, the rap group Grandmaster Flash and the Furious Five released a rap called "The Message,"* a searing description of ghetto culture:
Got a bum education, double-digit inflation Can't take the train to the job, there's a strike at the
station
Don't push me, 'cause I’m close to the edge I'm tryin’ not to lose me head It's like a jungle sometime it makes me wonder How I keep from going under.
In the late 1980s, the Compton and Watts neighborhoods of Los Angeles—two of the most distressed minority communities in the city—produced their own style, known as West Coast rap, with such groups as Ice Cube, Ice T, Tupac Shakur, and Snoop Doggy Dog. West Coast rap often had a harsh, angry character, and at its extremes (the so-called gangsta' rap), it could be strikingly violent and highly provocative. Scandals erupted over controversial lyrics—Ice T's "Cop Killer," which some critics believed advocated murdering
Opposing the "New World Order"
In the United States and other industrial nations, opposition to globalization-or to what President George H. W. Bush once called "the new world order”-took several forms. Many
Americans on both the left and the right
Intervention °PPosed the nation’s increasingly interven-tionist foreign policy. Critics on the left charged that the United States was using military action to advance its economic interests, in the 1991 Gulf War and, above all, in the Iraq War that began in 2003. Critics on the right claimed that the nation was allowing itself to be swayed by the interests of other nations-as in the humanitarian interventions in Somalia in 1993 and the Balkans in the late 1990s-
and was ceding its sovereignty to international organizations. But the most impassioned opposition to globalization in the
West came from an array of groups that saw it as an economic threat. Labor unions insisted that the rapid expansion of free-trade agreements led to the export of jobs from advanced nations to less developed ones. Other groups attacked working conditions in new manufacturing countries on humanitarian
grounds, arguing that the global economy was creating new classes of "slave laborers” working in conditions that few Western nations would tolerate. Environmentalists argued that globalization, in exporting industry to low-wage countries, also exported industrial pollution and toxic waste to nations that had no effective laws to control them, and contributed significantly to global warming. And still others opposed global economic arrangements on the grounds that they enriched and empowered large multinational corporations and threatened the freedom and autonomy of individuals and communities.
The opponents of globalization were mostly agreed on the targets of their discontent: not just free-trade agreements, but also the multinational institutions that policed and advanced
Globalization the gl°bal economy- Among them were the
Protested World Trade Organization, which monitored the enforcement of the GATT treaties of the 1990s, the International Monetary Fund, which controlled international credit and exchange rates; and the World Bank, which made money available for development projects m many countries. In November 1999, when the leaders of the
868
KANYE WEST
Testifying to the continued popularity of rap, as of 2014 rapper Kanye West remains one of the best selling artists of all time, having sold over 21 million albums and 66 million digital downloads. Time magazine has named West one of the 100 most influential people in the world. He is a rapper, songwriter, record producer, film director, entrepreneur and fashion designer. (© Getty Images Entertainment/Getty Images) police; and the sexually explicit lyrics of 2 Live Crew and other groups, which critics accused of advocating violence against women.
But it was not just the lyrics that caused the furor. Rap artists were almost all products of tough inner-city neighborhoods, and the rough-edged styles many took with them into the public eye made many people uncomfortable. Some rappers got caught up in highly publicized trouble with the law. Several—including two of rap's biggest stars, Tupac Shakur and Notorious B.I.G.—were murdered. The business of rap, particularly the confrontational business style of Death Row Records (founded by Dr, Dre, a veteran of the first major West Coast rap group NWA), was a source of public controversy as well.
These controversies at times unfairly dominated the image of rap as a whole. Some rap is angry and cruel, as are many of the realities of the world from which it comes, But much of it is
explicitly positive, some of it deliberately gentle. Chuck D and other successful rappers use their music to exhort young black men to avoid drugs and crime, to take responsibility for their children, to get an education. And the form, if not the content, of the original rappers has spread widely through American culture. Rap came to dominate the music charts in America, and its styles made their way onto Sesame Street and other children's shows, into television commercials, Hollywood films, and the everyday language of millions of people, young and old, black and white. It became another of the arresting, innovative African American musical traditions that have shaped American culture for more than a century. •
*Edward Fletcher, M. Glover, and S. Robinson, "The Message," recorded 1982 by Grand Master Flash & The Furious Five. Reprinted by permission of Sugar Hill Music Publishing Ltd.
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What other African American musical forms have helped shape American popular culture?
2.	If rap is so closely associated with the inner-city culture where it originated, what accounts for its widespread popularity and commercial success? What other forms or styles of popular music enjoy a popularity that extends far beyond its cultural origins?
3.	Do you think rap's popularity will endure? Why or why not?
PROTESTS IN SEATTLE, 1999
When the World Trade Organization held its annual meeting in Seattle, Washington, in late 1999, thousands of demonstrators crowded into the city to protest the WTO’s role in the globalization of the economy and, they believed, the exploitation of working people in the United States and around the world. Their rowdy and at times violent demonstrations postponed the opening of the conference. In this photograph, a protester faces Seattle police in a cloud of tear gas, waiting to be arrested. Similar demonstrations disrupted other meetings of global economic organizations over the next several years, including protests in Washington and Genoa, Italy. (© Andy Clark/Reuters/Corbis) DEBATING THE PAST
j
Women's History
U T C? O D T A WT O
have 'on9 cons’^erecl influence of ideas, economic inter-XX 1 u 1 U XIX HIN Oests, class, and race and ethnicity on the course of history. Women's history challenged them to consider as well the role of gender. Throughout history, many scholars now argue, societies have created distinctive roles for men and women. How those roles have been defined, and the ways in which the roles affect how people and cultures behave, should be central to our understanding of both the past and the present. In the nineteenth century, women's history generally stressed the unrecognized contributions of women to history—for example, Sarah Hale's 1853 Record of All Distinguished Women from "the Beginning" till A.D. 1850. Work of the same sort continued into the twentieth century and, indeed, continues today.
But after 1900, people committed to progressive reform movements began to produce a different kind of women's scholarship, focusing primarily on the ways in which women were victimized by industrialism. Feminist scholars such as Edith Abbott, Margaret Byington, and Katherine Anthony examined the impact of economic change on working-class families, with a special focus on women; and they looked at the often deplorable conditions in which women worked in factories, mills, and other people's homes. Their goal was less to celebrate women's contributions than to
direct attention to the oppression of women by harsh working conditions and arouse sentiment for reform.
After the victory of the suffrage movement in 1920, women's history entered a half century of relative inactivity. Women continued to write important histories in many fields, and some—for example, Eleanor Flexner, whose Century of Struggle (1959) became a classic history of the suffrage crusade—wrote explicitly about women. Mary Beard, best known for her sweeping historical narratives written in collaboration with her husband, Charles Beard, published Women as a Force in History (1964), in which she argued for the historical importance of ordinary women as shapers of society, But such work at first had little impact on the writing of history as a whole.
seven leading industrial nations (and the leader of Russia) gathered for their annual meeting in Seattle, Washington, they were confronted with tens of thousands of protesters. Most of the protesters were peaceful, but some were violent, clashing with police, smashing store windows, and all but paralyzing the city. A few months later, a smaller but still substantial demonstration disrupted meetings of the IMF and the World Bank in Washington, D.C. And in July 2001, at a meeting of the same leaders in Genoa, Italy, an estimated 50,000 demonstrators clashed violently with police in a melee that left one protester dead and several hundred injured. The participants in the meeting responded to the demonstrations by pledging $1.2 billion to fight the AIDS epidemic in developing countries, and also by deciding to hold future meetings in remote locations far from major cities.
Defending Orthodoxy
Outside the industrialized West, the impact of globalization created other concerns. Many citizens of nonindustrialized nations resented the way the world economy had left them in poverty and, in their view, exploited and oppressed. In some parts of the nonindustrialized world-particularly in some of the Islamic nations of the Middle East-the increasing reach of globalization created additional grievances, rooted not just in economics but also in religion and culture.
The Iranian Revolution of 1979, in which orthodox Muslims
ousted a despotic government whose leaders had embraced
many aspects of modern Western culture, was one of the first
large and visible manifestations of a phenomenon that would
Rise of Islamic eventually reach across much of the Fundamentalism Islamic world and threaten the stability of the globe. In one Islamic nation after another, waves of fundamentalist orthodoxy emerged to
defend traditional culture against incursions from the West. One product of these resentments was a growing resort to
violence as a way to fight the influence of the West. Militants in various parts of the world used isolated incidents of violence and mayhem, designed to disrupt Western societies and governments and to create fear among their peoples. Such tactics are known to the world as terrorism.
The Rise of Terrorism
The term "terrorism” was used first during the French Revolution in the 1790s to describe the actions of the radical Jacobins against the French government. The word continued to be used intermittently throughout the nineteenth and early twentieth centuries to describe the use of violence as a form of intimidation against peoples and governments. But the wide-
spread understanding of terrorism as an important fact of modern life is largely a product of the end of the twentieth century and the beginning of the twenty-first.
Acts of what we have come to call terrorism have occurred in many parts of the world. Irish revolutionaries engaged in terrorism regularly against the English through much of the twentieth century. Jews used it in Palestine against the British before the creation of Israel, and Palestinians used it frequently against Jews in Israel-over several decades. Revolutionary
Origins of Terrorism
870
Along with the rise in modern feminism in the 1960s and 1970s, interest in women's history revived as well. Gerda Lerner, one of the pioneers of the new women's history, once wrote of the impact of feminism on historical studies: The recognition that we had been denied our history came to many of us as a staggering insight, which altered our consciousness irretrievably." Much of the early work was in the contributionist tradition, stressing the way in which women had played more notable roles in major historical events than historians had usually acknowledged. Other work stressed ways in which women had been victimized by their subordination to men and by their powerlessness within the industrial economy.
Increasingly, however, women's history began to question the nature of gender itself. Some scholars began to emphasize the artificiality of gender distinctions, arguing that the difference between women and men was socially constructed, superficial, and (in the public world, at least) unimportant. The history of women was, therefore, the history of how men (with the unwitting help of many women) had created and maintained a set of fictions about women's capacities that modern women were now attempting to shatter.
By the early 1980s, some feminists had begun to make a very different argument: that there were basic differences between women and men—not just biological differences, but differences in values, sensibilities, and culture. The feminists of the 1970s and 1980s did not see these differences as evidence of women's incapacities. They saw them, rather, as evidence of an alternative female culture capable of challenging (and improving) the male-dominated world. By the twenty-first century, some historians of women, therefore, began exploring areas of female experience that revealed the special character of women's culture and values: family, housework, motherhood, women's clubs and organizations, female literature, the social lives of working-class women, women's sexuality, and many other subjects that suggested "difference" more than "contributions" or "victimization." Partly in response, some historians began to make the same argument about men—that understanding "masculinity" and its role in shaping men's lives was as important as
understanding notions of "femininity" in explaining the history of women.
The notion of gender as a source of social and cultural difference raised a powerful challenge to the way in which scholars view the past. Many historians continue to believe that other categories (race and class in particular) have in fact been more important than gender in shaping the lives of men and women. But, as Joan Scott, a theorist of gender studies, contends, it is not enough simply to expand the existing story to make room for women. Rather, recognizing gender as a central force in the lives of societies calls for a reconceptualization of the past. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What is the emphasis in the "contributionist" tradition of women's history?
2.	How do women's history, feminist history, and gender history differ from one another?
3.	What does gender history add to our understanding of the past?
SEPTEMBER 11, 2001 One great American symbol, the Statue of Liberty, stands against a sky filled with the thick smoke from the destruction of another American symbol, New York City's World Trade Center towers, a few hours after terrorists crashed two planes into them. (© Daniel Hulshizer/AP Images)
872 CHAPTER 32
groups in Italy, Germany, Japan, and France have engaged in terrorist acts intermittently over the past several decades.
The United States, too, has experienced terrorism for many years, much of it against American targets abroad. These included the bombing of the Marine barracks in Beirut in 1983, the explosion that brought down an American airliner over Lockerbie, Scotland, in 1988, the bombing of American embassies in 1998, the assault on the U.S. naval vessel Cole in 2000, and other events around the world. Terrorist incidents were relatively rare, but not unknown, within the United States itself prior to September 11, 2001. Militants on the American left performed various acts of terror in the 1960s and early 1970s. In February 1993, a bomb exploded in the parking garage of the World Trade Center in New York City killing six people and causing serious, but not irreparable, structural damage to the towers. Several men connected with militant Islamic organizations were convicted of the crime. In April 1995, a van containing explosives blew up in front of a federal building in Oklahoma City, killing 168 people. Timothy McVeigh, a former Marine who had become part of a militant antigovernment movement of the American right, was convicted of the crime in 1997 and executed in 2001.
Most Americans, however, considered terrorism a problem that mainly plagued other nations. One of the many results of the terrible events of September 11, 2001, was to jolt the American people out of complacency and alert them to the presence of continuing danger. That awareness increased in the years following September 11. New security measures changed the way in which Americans traveled. New government regulations altered immigration policies and affected the character of international banking. Warnings of possible new terrorist attacks created widespread tension and uneasiness.
The War on Terrorism
In the aftermath of September 2001, the United States government launched what President Bush called a "war against terrorism/' The attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon, government intelligence indicated, had been planned and orchestrated by Middle Eastern agents of a pow-
Al Oaeda er^U^ terrorist network known as al-Qaeda. Its
*	leader, Osama bin Laden-until 2001 little known
outside the Arab world-quickly became one of the most notorious figures in the world. Convinced that the militant "Taliban” government of Afghanistan had sheltered and supported bin Laden and his organization, the United States began a sustained campaign of bombing against the regime and sent in ground troops to help a resistance organization overthrow the Afghan government. Afghanistan’s Taliban regime quickly collapsed, and its leaders-along with the al-Qaeda fighters allied with them-fled the capital, Kabul. American and anti-Taliban Afghan troops pursued them into the mountains, but failed to capture bin Laden and the other leaders of his organization.
American forces in Afghanistan rounded up several hun-
dred people suspected of connections to the Taliban and
al-Qaeda in the aftermath of the fighting and eventually moved
these prisoners to a facility at the American base in Guantanamo, Cuba. They were among the first suspected terrorists to be handled under the new laws created by the federal government to deal with terrorism after September 11, 2001. The Patriot Act of 2001 was the most important of these new laws. The post-September 11 laws and policies made it possible for suspected terrorists to be held for months, and in many cases years, without access to lawyers, without facing formal charges, subjected to intensive interrogation and torture. They became examples to many critics of the dangers to basic civil liberties they believed the war on terrorism had created.
Several Supreme Court rulings, including one in 2008, dismissed the Bush administration’s argument that detainees in Guantanamo were outside the reach of American law. But the administration was slow to comply. Before his election in 2008, Barack Obama promised to close the Guantanamo prison, which had become a symbol to many people of unfair treatment. But once in office, Obama found it difficult to keep this promise because of popular opposition to moving prisoners into facilities in the United States.
The Iraq War
In his State of the Union address to Congress in January 2002, President Bush spoke of an "axis of evil,” which included the nations of Iraq, Iran, and North Korea-all nations with anti-American regimes, all nations that either possessed or were thought to be trying to acquire nuclear weapons. Although President Bush did not say so at the time, many people around the world interpreted these words to mean that the United States would soon try to topple the government of Saddam Hussein in Iraq.
SADDAM HUSSEIN
On December 14, 2003, American forces captured Hussein at a farmhouse near Tikrit, Iraq. He was tried and found guilty of crimes against humanity for the death of 148 Iraqi Shi'ites. Hussein was hanged on December 30, 2006. (© Getty Images News/Getty Images)
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
» 873 
'TAL^j
oreece
/■
TUNISIA
KT %
.Tripoli
'"I
*1,
(/
Gulf o f -Sidra C
,7 Z/ f
///z
Ankara. TURKEY
J]; 1974—Fighting between	A
Ty Turkey and Greece over Cyprus a „ ^threatens NATO unity ,	■/"
G
X_^r' r CYPRUS } SYRIA
SOVIET UNION
LIBYA 1969—Qaddafi seizes power 1977—Abortive border war with Egypt
1986—U.S. responds to Libyan-backed terrorism by bombing Tripoli	,
A
Cairo, EGYPT LEBANON.6®^®’ ISRAEL^
i Jgnjsalem,: «Ammai JORDAN 1978—	Egypt and Israel' \ agree to Camp David accords'
1979—	Formal peace treaty signed between Egypt \ and Israel
1981—Sadat assasinated
CHAD
SUDAN
EXPANSION OF ISRAEL
LEBANON 1958—U.S.
intervention supports pro-West government 1981-1984—U.S. joins UN peacekeeping force, suffers series of violent attacks ISRAEL 1993—Israel and PLO sign accords for Palestinian self-rule in Jericho and Gaza Strip 2002-2003—Escalating violence leads to erection of wall along border of West Bank
GAZA STRIPV
SYRIA 1976—Invasion / w of Lebanon ) A GOLAN HEIGHTS
WEST BANK
Jerusalem* / ,Teheran 1980—Iran-lraq war 2003—American invasion and z occupation of Iraq
Aden
DJIBOUTI
SOMALIA
ETHIOPIA
KENYA
TANZANIA
.	Kabul.
AFGHANISTAN J 1979—U.S.
supports guerillas \	fighting Soviet invaders
2001—U.S. begins military l action against Taliban regime y for its support of terrorism
Strait of K.	PAKISTAN '
Hormuz	\ x7
Arabian S e a
IRAN
1953—U.S. supports Shah, helps put down anti-U.S. socialist government 1979—Shah overtrown 1979-1981—Hostage crisis
INDIAN
OCEAN
Israel, 1948
Territory gained, 1949 Territory occupied, 1967 Territory yielded, 1979-1982
Territory occupied, 1982-1986
Area of Israeli settlements
OPEC member nations
Major oil fields
OPEC:
Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries (Members not shown are Nigeria, Algeria, Gabon, Indonesia, Venezuela, and Ecuador) PLO:
Palestine Liberation Organization f

' /■,

? a


f ol

r
/
/ A
CRISES IN THE MIDDLE EAST
In the 1970s and beyond, the Middle East became one of the most turbulent regions of the world and one of the regions most vital to, and difficult for, the United States. The United States intervened in the Middle East frequently during the Cold War and beyond, in ways both large and small, as this map reveals. After the events of September 2001, those interventions increased. * Why did the United States have so much at stake in the Middle East?
developing what came to be known as "weapons of mass destruction,” which included nuclear weapons and agents of chemical and biological warfare. Less central to these arguments, at least in the United States, was the charge that the Hussein government was responsible for major violations of
For over a year after that, the Bush administration slowly
built a public case for invading Iraq. Much of that case rested
on two claims. One was that Iraq was supporting terrorist
groups that were hostile to the United States. The other, and
eventually the more important, was that Iraq either had or was
AMERICA IN THE WORLD
The Global Environmental Movement
O international movement for well over a century, environmentalism has grown rapidly throughout the world in the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries. What began as a series of efforts to preserve wilderness sites and to clean up air and water in particular nations has evolved into a broad effort to deal with problems that affect, and threaten, the entire globe.
Organizations both in the United States and elsewhere have sought to create an international environmental movement. The World Wildlife Fund (WWF) was created in Switzerland in 1961. It eventually attracted more than 5 million supporters in over 90 countries and now claims to be the world's largest independent conservation organization. Greenpeace was founded in Canada in 1971 in opposition to U.S. nuclear testing in Alaska. It too has grown into an international organization, with 2.9 million financial supporters worldwide and a presence in 42 nations. Leading American environmental associations include the Wilderness Society, the Sierra Club, and the National Audubon Society.
Nongovernmental organizations (NGOs) such as Greenpeace and WWF were not the only institutions to recognize environmental concerns. In June 1972, the United Nations held its first Conference on the Human Environment. Representatives of 113 countries attended the conference to discuss issues of global environmental importance—including the role of chlorofluorocarbons (CFCs), a chemical compound used in refrigerants and aerosol sprays, in depleting the ozone layer. After the conference, the UN created the United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP) to help coordinate international efforts for environmentalism and encourage sustainable development in poorer nations around the world.
The world's first "Green" parties—political parties explicitly devoted to environmental concerns (and often also to other issues of social justice)—appeared in 1972, beginning in New Zealand (the Values Party) and Tasmania (the United Tasmania Group). Since then, Green parties have proliferated throughout the world, including in the United States. The most powerful Green party to date has been Die Grune in Germany, founded in 1980.
Large-scale ecological catastrophes have often helped galvanize the global environmental movement. Among the more significant of these events was the Bhopal disaster of 1984, in which a gas leak at a Union Carbide pesticide plant in Bhopal, India, resulted in the deaths of an estimated 3,000 to 15,000 people. Two years later, a nuclear reactor accident in the Soviet city of Chernobyl in Ukraine caused 56 direct deaths, with predictions of many thousands more deaths to follow as a
result of exposure. The area around Chernobyl is expected to be partially contaminated for 24,000 years, the radioactive half-life of plutonium-239. A less catastrophic nuclear accident at Three Mile Island, Pennsylvania, in 1979 heightened antinuclear sentiment in the United States. In 1989, the oil tanker Exxon Valdez ran aground on Bligh Reef in Prince William Sound, Alaska, and spilled approximately 10.9 million gallons of crude oil. Eventually covering thousands of square miles of ocean water (and 1,300 miles of Alaska shoreline) in oil, the spill killed hundreds of thousands of animals instantly and devastated the fragile ecosystem of the Sound. An even greater oil spill occurred in the Gulf of Mexico in 2010 from an explosion in a deep well established by BP. Eleven people died in the explosion, and almost 5 million barrels of petroleum were released into the water.
In developed, industrialized nations, environmental advocacy has largely focused on energy policy, conservation, clean technologies, and changing individual and social attitudes about consumption (as in the recycling movement), In the developing world, however, the growth of environmentalism is often linked to issues of human and democratic rights and freedom from First World exploitation. For example, the Green Belt Movement in Kenya, begun in 1977 by Wangari Maathai, encouraged Kenyan women to plant over 30 million trees across the nation to address the challenges of deforestation, soil erosion, and lack of water. The Green Belt Movement
human rights. Except for the last, none of these claims turned out to be accurate.
In March 2003, American and British troops, with scant support from other countries and partial authorization from the United Nations, invaded Iraq and quickly toppled the Hussein regime. Hussein went into hiding but was eventually captured in December 2003 and executed in 2006. In May 2003, shortly after the American capture of Baghdad, President Bush made a dramatic appearance on an aircraft carrier off the coast of California, where, standing in front of a large sign reading "Mission Accomplished,” he declared victory in the Iraq War.
In fact, the war in Iraq continued for six more years, during which 3,600 soldiers were killed (out of just over 4,200 in total). Support for the war in the United States steadily declined in the first months of the war, especially when it became clear that the "weapons of mass destruction” in Iraq turned out not to exist. Reports of torture of Iraqi prisoners by American soldiers increased the unpopularity of the war.
The invasion of Iraq was the most visible evidence of a basic change in the structure of American foreign policy under the presidency of George W. Bush. Ever since the late 1940s, when the containment policy became the cornerstone of America’s role in the world, the United States had worked to maintain stability in the world by containing, but not often directly threatening or attacking, its adversaries. Even after the Cold War ended, the United States continued to demonstrate a reasonable level of constraint, despite its unchallenged military preeminence. In the administrations of George H. W. Bush and Bill Clinton, for example, American leaders worked closely with the United Nations and NATO to achieve U.S. international goals and usually resisted taking unilateral military action.
There had always been those who criticized these con-
straints. They believed that America should do more than
maintain stability, and should move actively to topple
undemocratic regimes and destroy potential enemies of the
United States. In the administration of George W. Bush,
874
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
» 875 became an important human rights and women's rights organization, focused on reducing poverty and promoting peaceful democratic change through environmental conservation and protection. Maathai, winner of the 2004 Nobel Peace Prize, has since served as Kenya’s assistant minister for Environment and Natural Resources.
In the past two decades the environmental movement has grown even more global in scope, with multilateral environmental treaties and worldwide summits becoming principal strategies of advocates. In 1997, an international effort to reduce global warming by mandating the lowering of greenhouse gas emissions culminated in the Kyoto protocols, which as of late 2010 had been ratified by 183 nations (with the United States a conspicuous exception). A leading figure in bringing the issue of global warming to wide attention both in the United States and around the world has been former vice president Al Gore, whose 2006 film, An Inconvenient Truth, may have done more to raise awareness of the threat of global warming than any other recent event. The film won an Academy Award as Best Documentary Feature, and Gore won the 2007 Nobel Peace Prize for his efforts on behalf of the movement he has championed. His co-winner was the International Panel on Climate Change, launched in Switzerland in 1988 and affiliated with the United Nations. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	Why are environmental movements in developing nations often linked to issues of human rights and protection from exploitation by developed nations? How do developed nations threaten the environment of developing nations?
2.	How did the 2010 BP explosion and oil spill in the Gulf of Mexico affect the environment? What was the effect on the environmental movement?
3.	Environmental organizations include grassroots associations, worldwide NGOs, and national political parties. How do these groups focus attention on environmental issues? Which type of organization do you think would be most successful at reaching its goals? Why?
these critics took control of American foreign policy and began to reshape it. The legacy of containment was repudiated. Instead, the public stance of the American government was Bush Foreign Policy that the United States had the right and the responsibility to spread freedom throughout the world-not just by exhortation and example, but also, when necessary, by military force. In Latvia in May 2005, President Bush spoke of the decision at the end of World War II not
challenge Soviet domination of Eastern Europe, a decision it had rested on the belief that such a challenge would d the United States into another war. The controversial eement negotiated at Yalta in 1945 by Roosevelt, urchill, and Stalin, which failed to end the Soviet occupa-n of Poland and other Eastern European nations, was, the ?sident said, part of an "unjust tradition' by which power-governments sacrificed the interests of small nations. This empt to sacrifice freedom for the sake of stability, the ■sident continued, "left a continent divided and unstable.
“MISSION ACCOMPLISHED,” 2003 President George W. Bush chose the USS Abraham Lincoln, an aircraft carrier moored just off the coast of San Diego, for his first major address after the end of formal hostilities in the Iraq War on May 1, 2003. To strengthen his own identification with the military, he flew in on an S-3 Viking that landed on the carrier's deck and appeared before cameras wearing a flight suit and carrying a helmet. Later, dressed in a conventional business suit, he addressed a crowd of service men and women on the deck, standing beneath a large banner reading “Mission Accomplished." Later, as fighting in Iraq continued with no clear end in sight, and as the war became increasingly unpopular, Bush received much criticism and ridicule for what many Americans considered a premature celebration of victory, f© Reuters/Corbis)
The lesson, Bush suggested, was that the United States and other great powers should value stability less and freedom more, and should be willing to take greater risks in the world to end tyranny and oppression.
TURBULENT POLITICS
The last years of the George W. Bush administration and those of Barack Obama’s presidency were difficult for each man. Bush suffered from the growing unpopularity of the Iraq War, the weak federal response to Hurricane Katrina that devastated New Orleans and the Gulf coast, and the loss of
876 . CHAPTER 32
i
Republican majorities in both houses of Congress. President Obama struggled to maintain support in light of the flagging support for the war in Afghanistan, a hostile Congress, and difficulties in rolling out his Affordable Care Act, the Administration’s comprehensive health care plan.
The Unraveling of the Bush Presidency
For most of the first three years of his presidency, George W. Bush enjoyed broad popularity because of his resolute stance against terrorism. Indeed, his firm position even buoyed his approval ratings during the controversial Iraq War, at least for a while. Bush’s domestic policies did little to strengthen him politically, however. The president’s tax cuts of 2001 disproportionately benefitted wealthy Americans, reflecting the view of White House economists that the best way to ensure growth was to put money into the hands of people most likely to invest. The tax cuts also contributed to the nearly $10 trillion increase in the national debt during the Bush presidency. Also controversial was one of Bush’s most significant domestic accomplishments, an education bill known as "No Child Left Behind,” which tied federal funding in schools to the success of students in taking standardized tests. Some educators and parents favored No Child Left Behind, but many others felt that students spent too many hours in the classroom learning how to take tests rather than think for themselves. By 2004, when the president faced reelection, it seemed by no means certain that he would be returned to office. Senator John Kerry of Massachusetts, a Vietnam veteran who opposed the war in Iraq, mounted a strong attack against the president by criticizing the his policies. But harsh assaults on Kerry in return, combined with the mobilization of large numbers of conservatives, helped Bush win a narrow victory.
Bush’s second term was a difficult one. The war in Iraq was going badly, and its growing unpopularity added to the rapidly declining approval ratings of the president himself-ratings
that by mid-2008 had reached the lowest level of presidential approval in the history of polling.
Perhaps even more damaging to President Bush was the gov-
Hurricane
Katrina
ernment’s response to a disastrous hurricane, Katrina, that devastated a massive swath of the coastline of the Gulf of Mexico in August 2005 and gravely damaged the city of New Orleans. The federal government’s slow response aroused anger throughout the
nation, contributing to the loss of the Republican majorities in both houses and leaving Bush with little support. At the same time, there were scandals in the Justice Department, revelations of illegal violations of civil liberties, and declining economic prospects that would culminate in the financial crisis of 2008.
The Election of 2008 and
the Financial Crisis
Both parties began the 2008 campaign with large fields of candidates, but by spring the contest had narrowed considerably. Senator John McCain of Arizona emerged from the early primaries with the Republican nomination assured. Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton of New York (the former First Lady) and Senator Barack Obama of Illinois campaigned aggressively against each other for months. Clinton might have been the first female U.S. president. But Obama’s organizational power among young voters and his inspirational messages of hope and change helped him secure primary votes and win the Democratic nomination. He entered the general election with a chance to become the nation’s first African American president.
McCain and Obama entered the campaign with very different programs. McCain supported the Iraq War and Obama did not. Obama wanted national health insurance and McCain did not. McCain wanted additional tax cuts to spur investment, while Obama urged tax increases on the wealthiest Americans. Obama went with experience and name recognition in picking
OBAMANIA
Posters of and about Barack Obama were widely visible during the 2008 presidential campaign. In this photograph, a New Yorker walks past one example of the Obama street art that spread through many American cities—and, indeed, through cities around the world. Among the depictions of Obama during the campaign were the work of leading artists, who saw in him a figure of possibly historic significance. (© Chris McGrath/Getty Images) THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION * 877
Barack Obama	365	69,297,997
(Democrat)	(53.7)
John McCain (Republican)
173	59,597,520
(46.2)
THE ELECTION OF 2008
The election of 2008 broke the pattern of very close divisions between the two parties and instead produced a decisive victory for Barack Obama. For the first time since 1996, Democrats won states in the South and carried most of the "swing states." The election also carried large majorities for the Democrats in both the House and the Senate, only to see the Republicans carry a majority of the House in 2010. his vice presidential running mate, Senator Joe Biden of Delaware. McCain chose an almost unknown figure to share his ticket-Governor Sarah Palin of Alaska. Palin soon became the hero of many conservatives in the Republican convention. But her inexperience seemed to damage the Republican campaign. Before the conventions, Obama was already leading strongly in the polls.
As the nomination campaigns were heating up, a series of financial problems had arisen in mid-2007. By 2008, the nation was facing its worst financial crisis since the Great Depression. For years, financial institutions had been developing new credit instruments intended to make borrowing easier and cheaper, which lured millions of people into taking on large and risky mortgages. One such instrument, called an adjustable rate mortgage (ARM), offered homebuyers mortgages with initially low interest rates that would increase in later years. Other loans, called "jumbo loans/’ extended credit to people who lacked the financial means needed to pay them back. For a while, the sale of houses, many of which were based on these risky mortgages, increased, causing a "housing bubble”-a rapid rise in housing prices fueled by high demand. These business practices were made possible with the repeal of the Glass-Steagall Act in 1999. Glass-Steagall had been passed in 1933 to prevent irresponsible banking practices by mandating layers of government oversight designed to catch fraud or risky investment strategies. With more and more purchases, the price of homes fell. In time,
however, many people with the reset higher mortgage rates or jumbo loans could not sell the homes that they could no longer afford. In many cases, the market value of the home sank below the value of the mortgages held, causing some homeowners to walk away from their property and default on their loans. Foreclosures were numerous across the country. Many of the nation’s largest banks had invested heavily in the securities that backed these risky loans; now, with the collapse of the housing market, they lost vast sums of money.
The so-called Great Recession of 2008, influenced by the loan crisis, also pushed down wages and triggered widespread job layoffs making it impossible for the additional owners of 2008	ARMS and jumbo loans to make payments
Financial t^IUS increasing the number of home fore-Crisis	closures. Many Americans could not meet
their other financial obligations such as the repayment of school loans or credit card debt. There was also less money available for investing, or economic growth. The increased unemployment rate further accelerated the down-
ward economic spiral.
By mid-September 2008, the financial crisis suggested an economy falling out of control. Secretary of the Treasury Henry Paulson, supported by other economic leaders, proposed the massive use of federal funds to help the government bail out banks that were failing. Both the Bush administration and eventually the Obama administration won congressional support for $750 billion in the form of the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP) to shore up the tottering financial institutions. The bailout kept the economy from collapsing, but it remained very weak for several years, with exceptionally high unemployment rates.
During this crisis, McCain and Obama fought out the last two months of their campaign. Obama benefited from George W. Bush’s unpopularity. With the incoming president facing another powerful downturn in the economy, McCain’s response seemed to associate him with Bush’s policies, increasingly viewed by many Americans as causing the financial meltdown, whereas Obama conveyed a message that seemed to signal new and more hopeful possibilities. What had been at times a close race ended in a strong showing for Obama, and on November 4, 2008, he won the popular vote 53 percent to 46 percent and the electoral vote by an even larger margin.
The Obama Presidency
Few modern presidents have entered the White House with higher expectations from the nation and even the world, so it was inevitable that many of Obama’s supporters would eventually be disappointed. The enormity of the tasks Obama faced-managing the worst economy since the 1930s, one war in Iraq and another in Afghanistan, and a polarized political climate-made his presidency extraordinarily difficult.
At the time of Obama’s inauguration, millions of Americans were unemployed. Major companies, especially in the
878 • CHAPTER 32
automobile industry, faced bankruptcy. The home mortgage and other financial industries were still on the verge of collapse despite Bush's intervention. Obama’s initial aspirations had to be put aside to confront the very dangerous reality that the country was on the verge of an economic depression possibly greater in scope and impact than the one of the 1930s.
To shore up the faltering economy, Obama engineered the largest economic stimulus in history. The Obama stimulus package, announced in 2009, included tax cuts, expanded
„	unemployment benefits, and increased
Stimulus	,	,	. r
Package	spending on education, infrastructure,
police, health care, and job creation. The total funding for all of these programs reached $787 billion. Though controversial and passed by only a slight margin in Congress, in 2014 most economists agree that the stimulus measures saved the economy from catastrophe. Still, a large number of critics believe that Obama’s stimulus package was a significant waste of money that added considerably to the
national debt.
Even in such a precarious economic environment, Obama pressed for the passage of his Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act to realize the dream of many liberals since the 1930s: universal health care. The act urged all Americans to purchase health insurance, making provisions to help those of limited financial means to acquire it. Though the bill finally passed Congress in March 2010 despite threats of filibustering, the Republicans condemned this reform as "socialized medicine” and vowed to repeal it or defeat it through judicial action. Most of the benefits of the Affordable Care Act, as it is more commonly known, did not go into effect until 2014, that is, until Obama’s second term. To the embarrassment of the administration and delight of critics, the rollout of the plan in October 2013 experienced significant technical problems when the federal website designed to process new insurance applications failed to work properly.
There were many opponents of "Obamacare”-as many derisively called the Affordable Care Act. Some of Obama’s political adversaries were a group of evangelical, conservative, and libertarian Republicans who came to be known as the "Tea Party.” An
early leader of the Tea Party was Senator Ted Cruz of Texas. Although the Tea Party could not stop passage of the Affordable Care Act, they used their opposition to it to spearhead their overall conservative agenda: deficit reduction, tax reduction, and smaller government. The Tea Party’s appeal to wealthy conservatives brought large financial contributions that gave this group a disproportionate political influence that belied its relatively small numbers. With the help of the conservative media, the Tea Party exerted increasing pressure on the Republican Party as a whole. In the 2010 midterm elections, 130 Tea Party-endorsed candidates were sworn in as members of Congress. The Tea Party contributed to the strong polarization of the federal government that resulted in a great deal of legislative gridlock, including a
Tea Party
shutdown of many federal services and operations from October 1 to 16, 2013, when Congress did not vote to provide the necessary funds.
Obama came into office with an ambitious plan for reshaping America’s role in the world. The American combat role in Iraq was diminishing in the last year of
International the Buspl administration, but Obama
RelationS brought it to an end in August 2010. At the same time, he committed significant additional troops to the war in Afghanistan, where Americans had been fighting since 2001.
With former rival Hillary Clinton as his secretary of state, Obama sought peace between Israel and Palestine-an effort that, like all previous ones, was extraordinarily difficult. They sought to improve relations with many nations that the Iraq War had damaged and built new international trade opportunities. In 2009, Obama was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize for his "extraordinary efforts to strengthen international diplomacy and cooperation between peoples.” In the fall of 2010, President Obama visited India, China, and South Korea hoping for progress on trade, but China and South Korea failed to reach agreements with the United States.
The Tea Party wasn’t Obama’s only critic during his first
term-he also faced opposition from the political left. Some
Democrats felt that he had moved too far to the right and had
unnecessarily compromised core Democratic goals. Many
people believed that Obama had failed to do many of the
things he had promised to do in the campaign, such as closing
the Guantanamo prison. Disgruntled critics protested that
the president did not punish those financiers whom they
held responsible for the global economic crisis. The so-called
Occupy Wall Street movement arose as a populist response
to the perception of increasing economic inequality.
Protesters gathering in New York’s Zuccotti Park near Wall
_	Street and in other cities across the coun-
Occupy Wall
Street	try use(^ tir^e °f an article by econo-
mist Joseph Stiglitz, "Of the 1%, by the 1%, for the 1%,” to animate their position. In his article, Stiglitz argued that the wealthiest 1 percent of Americans owned over 40 percent of the nation’s wealth. The crowd roared back "We are the 99 percent” to heighten the disparity between the fabulously wealthy and everyone else. Economic inequality became an important theme in the presidential
election of 2012.
The impact of money on politics became mainstream news in 2010 with the Supreme Court decision in Citizens United v. Federal Election Commission. In this case, the conservative-leaning court ruled that government couldn’t limit campaign-related expenditures from corporations or unions. Critics of the decision, including people sympathetic to the "Occupy” movement, felt that it favored the Republicans because wealthy donors tended to donate to that party. The ability of corporations to donate freely to individual campaigns would change the financing associated with the coming 2012 presidential election; indeed, more money was spent on that election than on any other in history.
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION * 879
While Barack Obama and Joe Biden once again occupied the Democratic ticket, the Republican primaries were tough contests involving a large field of candidates. Businessman and former Massachusetts governor Mitt Romney finally prevailed to win the Republican nomination with his vice presidential running mate, Representative Paul Ryan of Wisconsin. Originally a moderate Republican, Romney changed his position on a range of issues, including abortion and health care, apparently to appeal to the increasingly conservative nature of his party. Democrats would make his changed positions a focus of their campaign.
The key issues of the 2012 election included health-care reform, immigration reform, the federal budget deficit, and taxation and spending. The strained economy kept the focus more on domestic than international concerns. Perhaps the most pressing issue, though, was the high rate of unemployment-a problem that President Obama had struggled to remedy throughout most of his first term. Despite this lingering problem, Obama outlined his successes and pointed to them as the justification for a second term. He had withdrawn most of the troops from Iraq, as promised. Most dramatically, he had succeeded in overseeing the tracking down and, on May 2, 2011, the killing of al-Qaeda leader Osama bin Laden, the mastermind of the 9/11 attacks. One of Obama's greatest legislative achievements-the Affordable Care Act-also survived a challenge to its constitutionality in the Supreme Court’s 2012 decision in National Federation of Independent Business v. Sebelius.
The head-to-head contest between Romney and Obama at times seemed close, but a generally improving economy, the death of bin Laden, and several political missteps by Romney helped Obama. When voters finally cast their ballots, Obama won 51 percent of the popular vote to Romney’s 47 percent, translating into 332 electoral votes for the president and 206 for his rival.
President Obama’s second term posed many challenges on both the domestic and international fronts. One event that extended to both realms was the disclosure of a large number of classified documents by computer spe-
Controversy cialist Edward Snowden. On June 5, 2013, Snowden, a former contractor for the
National Security Agency (NSA), released a vast number of classified documents to several media outlets. This action was viewed by many observers as the most serious leak since Daniel Ellsworth released the Pentagon Papers in 1971. The released documents showed extensive governmental surveillance of private Internet and telephone data, including the monitoring of the personal phone lines of such foreign leaders as Germany’s Chancellor Angela Merkel. Snowden fled the United States, first to China and then to Russia, to avoid criminal charges. Some called Showden a traitor, others, a heroic champion of civil liberties.
One of the most serious international events during President Obama’s second term took place in Syria, a country locked in violent civil war since 2011. Opponents of the Ba’ath government sought the ouster of President Bashar al-Assad and his repressive regime. Assad unleashed the army in response, killing an estimated 120,000 of his own people by September 2013. The displacement of hundreds of thousands of Syrians into neighboring countries threatened to further destabilize the region. Assad’s use of chemical weapons triggered a strong condemnation by the United States and its European allies. Working with Russia, a traditional ally of the Assad regime, the United States and Europe brokered a deal to remove the stockpile of chemical weapons from the country. Obama, aware of the national unwillingness for the United States to become involved in another ground war, resisted calls for sending troops to dislodge Assad. The violent struggle continued through 2014 with no solution in sight.
The political gridlock of Obama’s presidency continued into his second term. Many of his initiatives either encoun-
ered serious obstacles or did not come to pass. After his sec-)nd inaugural, Obama and his strategists hoped to cement heir gains among the Latino population revealed in the general election. Many Republicans, as well,
Political believed that their party should reach out Gridlock	,	f	,
to this growing sector of the population by rushing through an immigration reform bill. On June 27, 2013, he Senate passed the Border Security, Economic Opportunity, md Immigration Modernization Act of 2013 as a comprehen-iive package of provisions, including a path to US citizenship or illegal immigrants already in the country. As of spring 2014, he House had not passed the bill owing to powerful conserva-;ive Republican opposition.
THE ELECTION OF 2012
President Obama and Vice President Biden won a decisive victory over Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan. Republicans retained control of the House while Democrats kept
control of the Senate.
880 • CHAPTER 32
OBAMA GRIEVES WITH A NATION
President Barak Obama speaks at a memorial service for the 26 people killed on December 16, 2012 by a gunman at the Sandy Hook Elemetary School. His subsequent attempts at gun control reform were blocked by the House of Representative whose majority argued for the right of Americans to keep and bear arms without interference from the government. (© AFP/Getty Images) Another disappointment for President Obama and his supporters involved the failure to enact meaningful gun control measures despite a series of horrific shootings occurring during his terms in office, including the shooting of twenty children and six adults at the Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Connecticut, on December 14, 2012. Despite the president’s promise to exert "whatever power this office holds" to generate such gun control reform, the Congress resisted enacting any such legislation. The National Rifle Association and the conservative wing of the Republican Party successfully warded off any change on the federal level of the right of Americans to buy and use guns.
The gridlock of the House also dashed any hopes President Obama had of gaining a grand budget deal. The Congress remained sharply divided on questions of taxation, budget deficits, and government spending. In early 2014, the federal government did avert another shutdown in a move that some in the media interpreted as a sign of restored power to the mainstream Republican leadership and a lessening of the influence of the Tea Party.
LOOKING BACK
The United States in the first decade of the twenty-first century was a nation beset with many problems and anxieties. U.S. foreign policy after the attacks of September 11, 2001, had not only divided the American people but had also deeply alienated much of the world. The American economy was struggling as early as 2007 and, in the fall of 2008, experienced the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. By 2014 the economy had improved but some polls indicated a continuing sense of uncertainty about the future among many Americans. Gridlock continued at the federal level, making it difficult to achieve sweeping reform in several
key areas. Political divisions-not only among politicians, but also among voters-were as great as they had been in many years.
The United States remains the wealthiest and most powerful nation in the world, and it continues to cherish great ideals and great hopes. Moving forward into an uncertain future, Americans are burdened with serious problems and great challenges, but they are also armed with extraordinary resilience and energy that has allowed the nation-through its long and turbulent history-to endure, to flourish, and to imagine and strive for a better future.
Key Terms/People/Places/Events
AIDS 866 Al Gore 859 Al-Qaeda 872 Barack Obama 876 Bill Clinton 857 George W. Bush 859
Hillary Rodham Clinton 857
John McCain 876 Monica Lewinsky 859 "New World Order” 868 Newt Gingrich 858
North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) 857
Osama bin Laden 872 Taliban 872
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	What challenges did Bill Clinton face upon his election to the presidency? What were the accomplishments of his administration? What were its setbacks and failures?
2.	What led to the economic boom of the 1980s and 1990s? What setbacks to the economy occurred in those years?
3.	On what issues do critics of genetic and stem-cell research focus their opposition?
4.	What was the digital revolution, and how did it affect U.S. politics, the U.S. economy, and American society?
5.	How has America's relationship to the rest of the world changed as a result of the war on terrorism and U.S. involvement in Iraq and Afghanistan?
6.	What were Barack Obama’s most important achievements in his first term as president? What were his principal failures?
7.	What is America’s place in the world today? What are the challenges and opportunities facing the nation?
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION > 881
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
.........1992..........
Bill Clinton elected president
*	1993
Congress ratifies North
1994		American Free Trade
Congress rejects health-care	•	Agreement (NAFTA)
reform	A .	1995
Republicans win control of both		Showdown between president
houses of Congress		and Congress leads to
1996	•	shutdown of federal government
Clinton reelected president; Republicans retain control of		
Congress	•	1997
Congress passes and president		President and Congress agree
signs major welfare reform bill,		on plan to balance budget
minimum-wage increase, and		Justice Department files
health-insurance reform		antitrust suits against Microsoft
1998		
	9	
Lewinsky scandal rocks Clinton		
presidency	A	1999
Democrats gain in	9	Senate acquits Clinton in
congressional elections		impeachment trial
Clinton impeached by House 2000		
	9	
George W. Bush wins contested		
presidential election	•	2001 Terrorists destroy World Trade
2002	•	Center and damage Pentagon
Corporate scandals rock		United States begins military
business world	•	action against Afghanistan 2003 United States invades Iraq
2004	•	
Bush defeats John Kerry in		2005
presidential election	•	Hurricane Katrina devastates
2006	a	New Orleans and the Gulf Coast
Democrats gain control of both		
houses of Congress	•	zuu/
Troop "surge" in Iraq Mortgage crisis weakens
2008	economy
Barack Obama elected nation’s first African American president	
